California, session 20252026, SB482.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12242 is added to the Government Code, to read:12242. No more than 120 days after each general election, the governing body of each city, county, or city and county, or their delegated local entity, including, but not limited to, the office of the city clerk or the office of the county administrator, shall submit to the Secretary of State by electronic means an updated list of local elected or appointed officials for publication in the roster of public officials, as described in Section 12240.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.